Ohio, session 136, HB164.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 103.44, 103.45, 103.46, 103.47, 7
103.48, 103.49, and 103.50 of the Revised Code be enacted to 8
read as follows: 9
Sec. 103.44. As used in sections 103.45 to 103.50 of the 10
Revised Code: 11
(A) "Other public schools" includes the state school for 12
the deaf, the state school for the blind, community schools 13
established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, STEM 14
schools established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, and 15
college-preparatory boarding schools established under Chapter 16
3328. of the Revised Code. 17

H. B. No. 164 Page 2
As Introduced
(B) "State institution of higher education" has the same 18
meaning as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. 19
Sec. 103.45. (A) The joint education oversight committee 20
of the house of representatives and senate is hereby created. 21
The committee shall authorize a plan of work, which shall 22
include research, review, study, and analysis of current or 23
emerging education policy issues important to the state, the 24
available policy options to address such issues, and the 25
available data and research to support such analysis and 26
options. 27
(B) The committee also may select, for review and 28
evaluation, education programs at school districts, other public 29
schools, and state institutions of higher education that receive 30
state financial assistance in any form. The reviews and 31
evaluations may include any of the following: 32
(1) Assessment of the uses school districts, other public 33
schools, and state institutions of higher education make of 34
state money they receive, and a determination of the extent to 35
which that money improves student, district, school, or 36
institutional performance in the areas for which the money was 37
intended to be used; 38
(2) Determination of whether an education program meets 39
its intended goals, has adequate operating or administrative 40
procedures and fiscal controls, encompasses only authorized 41
activities, has any undesirable or unintended effects, and is 42
efficiently managed; 43
(3) Examination of pilot programs developed and initiated 44
in school districts, at other public schools, and at state 45
institutions of higher education to determine whether the 46

H. B. No. 164 Page 3
As Introduced
programs suggest innovative, effective ways to deal with 47
problems that may exist in other districts, schools, or 48
institutions of higher education, or to create opportunities for 49
success, and to assess the fiscal costs and likely impact of 50
adopting the programs throughout the state. 51
(C) The committee may prepare a report of the results of 52
each review and evaluation it conducts, make recommendations to 53
the general assembly and transmit the report and its 54
recommendations to the general assembly under section 101.68 of 55
the Revised Code. It also may submit the report and its 56
recommendations to the chairpersons and members of the standing 57
committees of the house of representatives and the senate 58
principally responsible for education policy. 59
(D) If the general assembly directs the joint education 60
oversight committee to submit a study to the general assembly by 61
a particular date, the committee, upon a majority vote of its 62
members, may modify the scope and due date of the study to 63
accommodate the availability of data and resources. 64
Sec. 103.46. The joint education oversight committee may 65
review bills and resolutions regarding education that are 66
introduced or offered in the general assembly, and may prepare a 67
report of its review. The committee shall transmit its report to 68
the general assembly under section 101.68 of the Revised Code. 69
The report may include the committee's determination regarding 70
the bill's or resolution's desirability as a matter of public 71
policy. 72
The committee's decision on whether and when to review a 73
bill or resolution has no effect on the general assembly's 74
authority to act on the bill or resolution. 75

H. B. No. 164 Page 4
As Introduced
Sec. 103.47. The joint education oversight committee 76
chairperson may, subject to approval by the speaker of the house 77
of representatives or the speaker's designee and the president 78
of the senate or the president's designee, employ professional, 79
technical, and clerical employees as are necessary for the joint 80
education oversight committee to be able successfully and 81
efficiently to perform its duties. All the employees are in the 82
unclassified service and may be terminated by the chairperson, 83
subject to approval of the speaker of the house of 84
representatives or the speaker's designee and president of the 85
senate or the president's designee. The committee may contract 86
for the services of persons who are qualified by education and 87
experience to advise, consult with, or otherwise assist the 88
committee in the performance of its duties. 89
Sec. 103.48. The chairperson of the joint education 90
oversight committee may request that the director of education 91
and workforce or the chancellor of higher education appear 92
before the committee. If so requested, the director or the 93
chancellor shall appear before the committee at the time and 94
place specified in the request. 95
Sec. 103.49. (A) The chairperson of the joint education 96
oversight committee may request any state agency or political 97
subdivision to provide to the committee such data, statistics, 98
and other information that is determined to be useful to the 99
work of the committee pursuant to the committee's statutory 100
purposes. Subject to division (B) of this section, and to the 101
extent permitted under section 3319.321 of the Revised Code and 102
the "Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974," 20 103
U.S.C. 1232g, as amended, any state agency or political 104
subdivision shall provide the committee with the information 105
requested. 106

H. B. No. 164 Page 5
As Introduced
(B)(1) Upon the joint written request of the chairperson 107
and vice-chairperson of the committee, the director of education 108
and workforce shall, within a reasonable time period, provide 109
the committee with data and information that is in the 110
director's possession or is readily accessible to the director. 111
(2) Upon receiving a written request from the chairperson 112
and vice-chairperson of the committee, the director may request 113
clarification from the committee regarding the request in order 114
to facilitate a timely response. The committee shall cooperate 115
with the director to determine the scope of the data and 116
information requested, taking into account the committee's need 117
and urgency for the information, the director's ease or 118
difficulty of accessing the data and information, the quantity 119
of the information requested, and any other practical 120
considerations that apply. 121
(3) Except as provided in division (B)(4) of this section, 122
if the director and the chairperson and vice-chairperson are 123
unable to resolve their differences regarding a written request 124
within thirty days of the director's receipt of the request from 125
the chairperson and vice-chairperson, the chairperson and vice- 126
chairperson may jointly insist in writing on receiving the data 127
and information from the director, and the director, upon 128
receiving that written request, shall promptly make that 129
information available to the chairperson and vice-chairperson. 130
(4) If the director requests clarification from the 131
committee under division (B)(2) of this section regarding a 132
written request for a large data set, as determined by the 133
director, the director may inform the chairperson and vice- 134
chairperson of the state director's determination that the 135
request is for a large data set and request that the period of 136

H. B. No. 164 Page 6
As Introduced
time in which the director and the chairperson and vice- 137
chairperson must resolve their differences regarding the request 138
under division (B)(3) of this section be extended beyond thirty 139
days of the director's receipt of the request. At no time, 140
however, shall the time period in which the director and the 141
chairperson and vice-chairperson must resolve their differences 142
regarding the request under division (B)(3) of this section be 143
longer than ninety days following the director's receipt of the 144
request. 145
Sec. 103.50. The joint education oversight committee shal l 146
consist of the following members: 147
(A) Five members of the house of representatives appointed 148
by the speaker of the house of representatives, three of whom 149
are members of the majority party and two of whom are members of 150
the minority party; 151
(B) Five members of the senate appointed by the president 152
of the senate, three of whom are members of the majority party 153
and two of whom are members of the minority party. 154
The term of each member begins on the day of appointment 155
to the committee and ends on expiration or other termination of 156
the member's term as a member of the house of representatives or 157
senate. The speaker of the house of representatives and 158
president of the senate shall make subsequent appointments not 159
later than fifteen days after the commencement of the first 160
regular session of each general assembly. Members may be 161
reappointed. A vacancy on the committee shall be filled in the 162
same manner as the original appointment. 163
In odd-numbered years, the speaker of the house of 164
representatives shall designate one of the majority members from 165

H. B. No. 164 Page 7
As Introduced
the house of representatives as chairperson and the president of 166
the senate shall designate one member from the senate, who is 167
not from the same political party as the chairperson, as the 168
ranking member. In even-numbered years, the president of the 169
senate shall designate one of the majority members from the 170
senate as the chairperson and the speaker of the house of 171
representatives shall designate one member from the house of 172
representatives, who is not from the same political party as the 173
chairperson, as the ranking member. 174
In appointing members from the minority, and in 175
designating ranking members who are from the minority, the 176
president of the senate and speaker of the house of 177
representatives shall consult with the minority leader of their 178
respective houses. 179
The committee shall meet at the call of the chairperson. 180
The committee shall meet not less often than once each calendar 181
month, unless the chairperson and ranking member agree that the 182
chairperson should not call the committee to meet for a 183
particular month. 184
Notwithstanding section 101.26 of the Revised Code, the 185
members, when engaged in their duties as members of the 186
committee on days when there is not a voting session of the 187
member's house of the general assembly, shall be paid at the per 188
diem rate of one hundred fifty dollars, and their necessary 189
traveling expenses. These amounts shall be paid from the funds 190
appropriated for the payment of expenses of legislative 191
committees. 192
The chairperson, when authorized by the committee and the 193
president of the senate and speaker of the house of 194
representatives, may issue subpoenas and subpoenas duces tecum 195

H. B. No. 164 Page 8
As Introduced
in aid of the committee's performance of its duties. A subpoena 196
may require a witness in any part of the state to appear before 197
the committee at a time and place designated in the subpoena to 198
testify. A subpoena duces tecum may require witnesses or other 199
persons in any part of the state to produce books, papers, 200
records, and other tangible evidence before the committee at a 201
time and place designated in the subpoena duces tecum. A 202
subpoena or subpoena duces tecum shall be issued, served, and 203
returned, and has consequences, as specified in sections 101.41 204
to 101.45 of the Revised Code. 205
The chairperson may administer oaths to witnesses 206
appearing before the committee. 207
Section 2. All items in this act are hereby appropriated 208
as designated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the 209
credit of the designated fund. For all operating appropriations 210
made in this act, those in the first column are for fiscal year 211
2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027. 212
The operating appropriations made in this act are in addition to 213
any other operating appropriations made for these fiscal years. 214
Section 3. 215
216
1 2 3 4 5
A JEO JOINT EDUCATION OVERSIGHT COMMITTEE
B General Revenue Fund
C GRF 047321 Operating Expenses $376,663 $378,668
D TOTAL GRF General Revenue Fund $376,663 $378,668

H. B. No. 164 Page 9
As Introduced
E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $376,663 $378,668
OPERATING EXPENSES 217
The foregoing appropriation item 047321, Operating 218
Expenses, shall be used to support expenses related to the Joint 219
Education Oversight Committee under sections 103.45 to 103.50 of 220
the Revised Code. 221
On July 1, 2026, or as soon as possible thereafter, the 222
Joint Education Oversight Committee may certify to the Director 223
of Budget and Management an amount up to the unexpended, 224
unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 047321, 225
Operating Expenses, at the end of fiscal year 2026 to be 226
reappropriated to fiscal year 2027. The amount certified is 227
hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item for fiscal 228
year 2027. 229
Section 4. Within the limits set forth in this act, the 230
Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts 231
indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation 232
made in this act, and shall determine the manner in which 233
appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from 234
operating appropriations contained in this act shall be 235
accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all 236
applicable provisions of, the main operating appropriations act 237
of the 136th General Assembly. 238
Section 5. That Section 733.40 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd 239
General Assembly is hereby repealed. 240